Utah statutes.
58-17b-604.   Medication profiles.

(1)  Each pharmacy shall establish a medication profile system for pharmacy patients according to the standards established by division rules made in collaboration with the board.  The rules shall indicate the method for recording all prescription information.

(2)  The pharmacy shall maintain the medication profile for any pharmacy patient who expresses a desire for that professional service.

(3)  The pharmacy may charge an appropriate professional fee for this service and for copying or providing information in the medication profile to another authorized person.

(4)  A pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy technician may not release or discuss the information contained in a prescription or patient's medication profile to anyone except:

(a)  the pharmacy patient in person or the pharmacy patient's legal guardian or designee;

(b)  a lawfully authorized federal, state, or local drug enforcement officer;

(c)  a third party payment program administered under terms authorized by the pharmacy patient;

(d)  a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy technician providing pharmacy services to the patient or a prescribing practitioner providing professional services to the patient;

(e)  another pharmacist, pharmacy intern, pharmacy technician, or prescribing practitioner to whom the patient has requested a prescription transfer; or

(f)  the pharmacy patient's attorney, after the presentation of a written authorization signed by the:

(i)  patient, before a notary public;

(ii)  parent or lawful guardian, if the patient is a minor;

(iii)  lawful guardian, if the patient is incompetent; or

(iv)  personal representative, if the patient is deceased.



Enacted by Chapter 280, 2004 General Session

